Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1127.01
Expanded function dental assistant; expanded function dental hygienist; display of permit.

Every person who owns, operates, or controls a facility in which an expanded function dental assistant or an expanded function dental hygienist is practicing shall display the permit of such person issued by the board for expanded functions in a conspicuous place in such facility.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 15.